Utah statutes.
53B-13-106.   Investments in bonds of the board.
The bonds of the board are securities, in which public officers and bodies of
this state, municipalities and municipal subdivisions, insurance companies and
associations, persons carrying on an insurance business, banks, trust
companies, savings banks and savings associations, saving and loan
associations, investment companies, administrators, guardians, executors,
trustees, other fiduciaries, and all other persons who are authorized to
invest in bonds or other obligations of the state, may properly and legally
invest funds, including capital, in their control or belonging to them.
